Hawaii statutes.
§554-9 Charitable trusts; leases.
Trustees of a charitable trust may modify, suspend, or waive the enforcement of
any provision of any lease or accept a surrender thereof if a leased land or
any structure built thereon has been destroyed in part or in whole by any
natural disaster, or the use of the land or the construction of any
improvements thereon has been restricted or prohibited in any manner by law,
ordinance, or regulation of any government agency due to natural disaster. [L
Sp 1960, c 8, §1; Supp, §340-9; HRS §554-9]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next